California statutes. Penal Code
(B) The marginal cost to supervise an offender on parole multiplied by the average length of stay on parole multiplied by the percentage of offenders admitted to prison
 who are subsequently released to parole supervision.

(2) The marginal cost to incarcerate an offender in prison specified in paragraph (1) shall be calculated by dividing the portion of the budget of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation that is annually adjusted based on changes in the prison population, including, but not limited to, pharmaceutical costs, by the average daily prison population.

(3) The marginal cost to supervise an offender on parole specified in paragraph (1) shall be calculated by dividing the portion of the budget of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation that is annually adjusted based on changes in the parole population by the average daily parole population.

(4) In carrying out the calculations pursuant to this subdivision, the Department of Finance, in consultation with
 the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall use data from the most recently completed fiscal year.

(b) The
 probation failure rate, calculated as the total number of adult felony probationers, individuals on mandatory supervision, and individuals on postrelease community supervision, sent to state prison as a percentage of the average
 adult felony probation, mandatory supervision, and postrelease community supervision population for that year.

(c) A felony probation baseline admission to prison rate for each county, calculated as an average of the annual felony probation admission to prison rate for calendar years 2022 and 2023.

(d) A mandatory supervision baseline admission to prison rate for each county, calculated as an average of the annual mandatory supervision admission to prison rate for calendar years 2022 and 2023.

(e) A postrelease
 community supervision baseline admission to prison rate for each county, calculated as an average of the annual postrelease community supervision admission to prison rate for calendar years 2022 and 2023.

(f) The probation failure rate for each county shall be calculated as the total number of adult felony probationers, individuals on mandatory supervision, and individuals on postrelease community supervision, sent to state prison from that
 county, as a percentage of the county’s average adult felony
 probation, mandatory supervision, and postrelease community supervision population for that year.

(g) An estimate of the number of adult felony probationers each county successfully prevented from being incarcerated in state prison. For each county,
 this estimate shall be calculated as the actual number of individuals from felony probation admitted to state prison from each county in the previous calendar year subtracted from each county’s felony probation baseline admission to prison rate, calculated pursuant to subdivision (c), multiplied by the average daily population of felony probation for each county in the previous calendar year.

(h) In calculating probation failure to prison rates for the state and individual counties, the number of adult felony probationers sent to state prison shall include those adult felony probationers sent to state prison for a revocation of
 probation, as well as adult felony probationers sent to state prison for a conviction of a new felony offense. The calculation shall also include adult felony probationers who are sent to state prison for a conviction of a new crime and who simultaneously have their probation terms terminated.

(i) A mandatory supervision failure to prison rate for each county. Each county’s mandatory supervision failure to prison rate shall be calculated as the number of offenders supervised under mandatory supervision pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 sent to prison from that county in the previous calendar year as a percentage of the county’s average mandatory supervision population for that year.

(j) An estimate of the number of felons on mandatory supervision each county successfully prevented from being incarcerated in state prison. For each county, this estimate shall be calculated as the actual number of individuals from mandatory supervision admitted to state prison from each county in the previous calendar year subtracted from each county’s mandatory supervision baseline admission to prison rate, calculated pursuant to subdivision (d), multiplied by the average daily population of mandatory supervision for each county in the previous calendar year.

(k) A postrelease community supervision failure to prison rate for each county. Each county’s postrelease community supervision failure to prison rate shall be calculated as the number of offenders supervised under postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) of Part 3 sent to prison from that county in the previous calendar year as a percentage of the county’s average postrelease community supervision population for that year.

(l) An estimate of the number of
 felons on postrelease community supervision each county successfully prevented from being incarcerated in state prison. For each county, this estimate shall be calculated as the actual number of individuals from postrelease community supervision admitted to state prison from each county in the previous calendar year subtracted from each county’s postrelease community supervision baseline admission to prison rate, calculated pursuant to subdivision (e), multiplied by the average daily population of postrelease community supervision for each county from the
 previous calendar year.

(m) The county return to prison rate. The combined individual county return to prison rate shall be calculated as the total number of offenders supervised by a county probation department as felony probationers, or
 subject to mandatory supervision pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or subject to postrelease community supervision, who were sent to prison, as a percentage of the average adult felony probation, mandatory supervision, and postrelease community supervision population for that county.

(n) A baseline return to prison rate for each county, calculated as an average of the county return to prison rate defined in subdivision (m) for calendar years 2022 and 2023.

(o) It is the intent of the Legislature to modify the calendar years upon which the baseline admission to prison rates specified in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (n) are based on, as necessary, to minimize the extent to which factors unrelated to performance affect county performance incentive payments calculated pursuant to Section
 1233.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 4.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.2.

(a) Beginning with the 2025–26 fiscal year, the amount of one hundred three million six hundred sixty-eight thousand ten dollars ($103,668,010) is hereby annually appropriated from the General Fund to the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund, established pursuant to Section 1233.5, for the community corrections program as a statewide performance maintenance payment. Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230. Funds shall be allocated by the Controller to counties according to the requirements of the program and pursuant to the following schedule:Alameda$ 2,330,216Alpine$ 168,800Amador$ 197,308Butte$ 351,445Calaveras$ 432,151Colusa$ 225,980Contra Costa$ 5,606,841Del Norte$ 168,800El Dorado$ 294,130Fresno$ 2,664,300Glenn$ 188,356Humboldt$ 890,805Imperial$ 171,540Inyo$ 187,451Kern$ 1,282,194Kings$ 933,353Lake$ 392,522Lassen$ 213,563Los Angeles$ 31,577,019Madera$ 1,044,486Marin$ 833,952Mariposa$ 168,800Mendocino$ 500,078Merced$ 871,819Modoc$ 171,311Mono$ 217,301Monterey$ 253,591Napa$ 278,323Nevada$ 564,871Orange$ 4,197,668Placer$ 460,696Plumas$ 373,623Riverside$ 5,869,455Sacramento$ 10,405,873San Benito$ 238,189San Bernardino$ 7,053,381San Diego$ 2,473,762San Francisco$ 2,583,106San Joaquin$ 1,879,816San Luis Obispo$ 1,116,156San Mateo$ 992,398Santa Barbara$ 1,195,901Santa Clara$ 1,475,130Santa Cruz$ 1,474,167Shasta$ 432,159Sierra$ 181,873Siskiyou$ 239,996Solano$ 681,311Sonoma$ 901,241Stanislaus$ 1,086,126Sutter$ 622,956Tehama$ 386,626Trinity$ 168,800Tulare$ 1,573,585Tuolumne$ 322,723Ventura$ 661,077Yolo$ 1,270,110Yuba$ 168,800(b) (1) In order for a county to receive the full amount allocated in subdivision (a), the return to prison rate for that county, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 1233.1, shall not exceed a threshold of 0.5 percentage points greater than the county baseline return to prison rate, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 1233.1.

(2) For each percentage point the county return to prison rate exceeds the threshold described in paragraph (1), the county allocation identified in subdivision (a) shall be reduced by a factor of 10 percent.

(c) If county allocations are reduced pursuant to subdivision (b), the amount appropriated from the General Fund to the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund in subdivision (a) shall be reduced by a corresponding amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 5.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.3.

The Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and the Judicial Council, shall, for the most recently completed calendar year, annually calculate a county performance incentive payment for each eligible county. A county shall be eligible for compensation for each of the following:

(a) The estimated number of felons on probation that were
 successfully prevented from being incarcerated in the state prison as calculated in subdivision (g) of Section 1233.1, multiplied by
 25 percent of the average of the state’s per capita costs to incarcerate a prison felony offender in a state prison and supervise an individual on parole, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1233.1.

(b) The estimated number of felons on mandatory supervision that were successfully prevented from being incarcerated in the state prison as calculated in subdivision
 (j) of Section 1233.1, multiplied by
 25 percent of the average of the state’s per capita costs to incarcerate a prison felony offender in a state prison and supervise an individual on parole, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1233.1.

(c) The estimated number of felons on postrelease community supervision that were successfully prevented from being incarcerated in the state prison as calculated in subdivision
 (l) of Section 1233.1, multiplied by
 25 percent of the average of the state’s per capita costs to incarcerate a prison felony offender in a state prison and supervise an individual on parole, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1233.1.

(d) County performance incentive payments awarded based on the calculation pursuant to this section shall be used as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1233.4 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 7.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.4.

If data of sufficient quality and of the types required for the implementation of this chapter are not available to the Department of Finance, the Department of Finance, in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and Judicial Council, shall use the best available data to estimate
 each county’s Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund grant allocation utilizing a methodology that is as consistent with that described in this chapter as is reasonably possible.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1233.5 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 8.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.5.

(a) A statewide performance maintenance payment calculated pursuant to Section 1233.2 and a county performance incentive payment calculated pursuant to Section
 1233.3 for any calendar year shall be provided to a county in the following fiscal year. The total annual payment to a county shall be divided into four equal quarterly payments.

(b) The Department of Finance shall include an estimate of the total performance maintenance payments and county performance incentive payments to be provided to counties in the coming fiscal year as part of the Governor’s proposed budget released no later than January 10 of each year. This estimate shall be adjusted by the Department of Finance, as necessary, to reflect the actual calculations of probation failure reduction incentive payments
 in consultation with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Chief Probation Officers of California, and the Judicial Council. This adjustment shall occur as part of standard budget revision processes completed by the Department of Finance in May of each year.

(c) There is hereby established, in the State Treasury, the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund, which is continuously appropriated. Moneys appropriated for purposes of statewide performance
 maintenance payments and county performance incentive payments authorized in Sections 1230 to 1233.6, inclusive, shall be transferred into this fund from the General Fund. Any moneys transferred into this fund from the General Fund shall be administered by the Judicial Council and the share calculated for each county probation department shall be transferred to its Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund authorized in Section 1230.

(d) For each fiscal year, the Department of Finance shall determine the total amount of the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund and the amount to be allocated to each county, pursuant to
 Sections 1230 to 1233.6, inclusive, and shall report those amounts to the Controller. The Controller shall make an allocation from the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund authorized in subdivision (c) to each county in accordance with the amounts provided.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, each fiscal year, the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) is hereby
 continuously appropriated from the State Community Corrections Performance Incentives Fund to the Judicial Council for the costs of implementing and administering this program, pursuant to subdivision (c), and the 2011 realignment legislation addressing public safety.

(f) A county that fails to provide the information required in Section 1231 to the Judicial Council shall not be eligible for the statewide performance maintenance payment pursuant to Section 1233.2 or the county performance incentive payment pursuant to Section 1233.3.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1233.6 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 9.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1233.6.

(a) The Department of Finance shall increase to no more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) the award amount for any county whose statewide performance maintenance payment and county performance incentive payment, as calculated pursuant to Sections 1233.2 and 1233.3, totals less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230.

(b) A county
 that fails to provide the information specified in Section 1231 to the Judicial Council shall not be eligible for payment pursuant to this section.

(c) The moneys appropriated pursuant to this chapter shall be used to supplement, not supplant, any other state or county appropriation for a CPO or a probation department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1233.7 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 11.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9. APPEALS IN FELONY CASES [1235. - 1265.]



  CHAPTER 1. Appeals, When Allowed and How Taken, and the Effect Thereof [1235. - 1246.]

1235.

(a) Either party to a felony case may appeal on questions of law alone, as prescribed in this title and in rules adopted by the Judicial Council. The provisions of this title apply only to such appeals.

(b) An appeal from the judgment or appealable order in a felony case is to the court of appeal for the district in which the court from which the appeal is taken is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 397.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1236.

The party appealing is known as the appellant, and the adverse party as the respondent, but the title of the action is not changed in consequence of the appeal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.

An appeal may be taken by the defendant from both of the following:

(a) Except as provided in Sections 1237.1, 1237.2, and 1237.5, from a final judgment of conviction. A sentence, an order granting probation, or the commitment of a defendant for insanity, the indeterminate commitment of a defendant as a mentally disordered sex offender, or the commitment of a defendant for controlled substance addiction shall be deemed to be a final judgment within the meaning of this section. Upon appeal from a final judgment the court may review any order denying a motion for a new trial.

(b) From any order made after judgment,
 affecting the substantial rights of the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (AB 249)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.1.

No appeal shall be taken by the defendant from a judgment of conviction on the ground of an error in the calculation of presentence custody credits, unless the defendant first presents the claim in the trial court at the time of sentencing, or if the error is not discovered until after sentencing, the defendant first makes a motion for correction of the record in the trial court, which may be made informally in writing. The trial court retains jurisdiction after a notice of appeal has been filed to correct any error in the calculation of
 presentence custody credits upon the defendant’s request for correction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 194, Sec. 2.   (AB 249)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.2.

An appeal may not be taken by the defendant from a judgment of conviction on the ground of an error in the imposition or calculation of fines, penalty assessments, surcharges, fees, or costs unless the defendant first presents the claim in the trial court at the time of sentencing, or if the error is not discovered until after sentencing, the defendant first makes a motion for correction in the trial court, which may be made informally in writing. The trial court retains jurisdiction after a notice of appeal has been filed to correct any error in the imposition or calculation of fines, penalty assessments, surcharges, fees, or costs upon the defendant’s request for correction. This section only applies in cases where the erroneous imposition or
 calculation of fines, penalty assessments, surcharges, fees, or costs are the sole issue on appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 194, Sec. 3.   (AB 249)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1237.5.

No appeal shall be taken by the defendant from a judgment of conviction upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or a revocation of probation following an admission of violation, except where both of the following are met:

(a) The defendant has filed with the trial court a written statement, executed under oath or penalty of perjury showing reasonable constitutional, jurisdictional, or other grounds going to the legality of the proceedings.

(b) The trial court has executed and filed a certificate of probable cause for such appeal with the clerk of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 550.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1238.

(a) An appeal may be taken by the people from any of the following:

(1) An order setting aside all or any portion of the indictment, information, or complaint.

(2) An order sustaining a demurrer to all or any portion of the indictment, accusation, or information.

(3) An order granting a new trial.

(4) An order arresting judgment.

(5) An order made after judgment, affecting the substantial rights of the people.

(6) An order modifying the verdict or finding by reducing the degree of the offense or the punishment imposed or modifying the offense to a lesser offense.

(7) An order dismissing a case prior to trial made upon motion of the court pursuant to Section 1385 whenever such order is based upon an order granting the defendant’s motion to return or suppress property or evidence made at a special hearing as provided in this code.

(8) An order or judgment dismissing or otherwise terminating all or any portion of the action including such an order or judgment after a verdict or finding of guilty or an order or judgment entered before the defendant has been placed in jeopardy or where the defendant has waived jeopardy.

(9) An order denying the motion of the people to reinstate the complaint or a portion thereof pursuant to Section 871.5.

(10) The imposition of an unlawful sentence, whether or not the court suspends the execution of the sentence, except that portion of a sentence imposing a prison term which is based upon a court’s choice that a term of imprisonment (A) be the upper, middle, or lower term, unless the term selected is not set forth in an applicable statute, or (B) be consecutive or concurrent to another term of imprisonment, unless an applicable statute requires that the term be consecutive. As used in this paragraph, “unlawful sentence” means the imposition of a sentence not authorized by law or the imposition of a sentence based upon an unlawful order of the court which strikes or otherwise modifies the effect of an enhancement or prior conviction.

(11) An order recusing the district attorney pursuant to Section 1424.

(b) If, pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a), the people prosecute an appeal to decision, or any review of such decision, it shall be binding upon them and they shall be prohibited from refiling the case which was appealed.

(c) When an appeal is taken pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), the court may review the order granting the defendant’s motion to return or suppress property or evidence made at a special hearing as provided in this code.

(d) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to authorize an appeal from an order granting probation. Instead, the people may seek appellate review of any grant of probation, whether or not the court imposes sentence, by means of a petition for a writ of mandate or prohibition which is filed within 60 days after probation is granted. The review of any grant of probation shall include review of any order underlying the grant of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 25.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1238.5.

Upon appeal by the prosecution pursuant to Section 1238, where the notice of appeal is filed after the expiration of the time available to defendant to seek review of an otherwise reviewable order or ruling and the appeal by the prosecution relates to a matter decided during the time available to the defendant to seek review of the otherwise reviewable order or ruling, the time for defendant to seek such review is reinstated to run from the date the notice of appeal was filed with proof of service upon defendant or his counsel.

The Judicial Council shall provide by rule for the consolidation of such petition for review with the prosecution appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1195.)
-------------------------------------------

1239.

(a) Where an appeal lies on behalf of the defendant or the people, it may be taken by the defendant or his or her counsel, or by counsel for the people, in the manner provided in rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(b) When upon any plea a judgment of death is rendered, an appeal is automatically taken by the defendant without any action by him or her or his or her counsel. The defendant’s trial counsel, whether retained by the defendant or court appointed, shall continue to represent the defendant until completing the additional duties set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1240.1.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 917, Sec. 4) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 551, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1239.1.

(a) It is the duty of the Supreme Court in a capital case to expedite the review of the case. The court shall appoint counsel for an indigent appellant as soon as possible. The court shall only grant extensions of time for briefing for compelling or extraordinary reasons.

(b) When necessary to remove a substantial backlog in appointment of counsel for capital cases, the Supreme Court shall require attorneys who are qualified for appointment to the most serious non-capital appeals and who meet the qualifications for capital appeals to accept appointment in capital cases as a condition for remaining on the court’s appointment list. A “substantial backlog” exists for this purpose when the time from entry of judgment in the trial court to appointment of counsel for appeal exceeds 6 months over a period of 12 consecutive
 months.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 66, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.

(a) When in a proceeding falling within the provisions of Section 15421 of the Government Code a person is not represented by a public defender acting pursuant to Section 27706 of the Government Code or other counsel and he is unable to afford the services of counsel, the court shall appoint the State Public Defender to represent the person except as follows:

(1) The court shall appoint counsel other than the State Public Defender when the State Public Defender has refused to represent the person because of conflict of interest or other reason.

(2) The court may, in its discretion, appoint either the State Public Defender or the attorney who represented the person at his trial when the person requests the latter to represent him on appeal and the attorney consents to the appointment. In unusual cases, where good cause exists, the court may appoint any other attorney.

(3) A court may appoint a county public defender, private attorney, or nonprofit corporation with which the State Public Defender has contracted to furnish defense services pursuant to Government Code Section 15402.

(4) When a judgment of death has been rendered the Supreme Court may, in its discretion, appoint counsel other than the State Public Defender or the attorney who represented the person at trial.

(b) If counsel other than the State Public Defender is appointed pursuant to this section, he may exercise the same authority as the State Public Defender pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15420) of Part 7 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.1.

(a) In any noncapital criminal, juvenile court, or civil commitment case wherein the defendant would be entitled to the appointment of counsel on appeal if indigent, it shall be the duty of the attorney who represented the person at trial to provide counsel and advice as to whether arguably meritorious grounds exist for reversal or modification of the judgment on appeal. The attorney shall admonish the defendant that he or she is not able to provide advice concerning his or her own competency, and that the State Public Defender or other counsel should be consulted for advice as to whether an issue regarding the competency of counsel should be raised on appeal. The trial court may require trial counsel to certify that he or she has counseled the defendant as to whether arguably meritorious grounds for appeal exist at the time a notice of appeal is filed. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any person having a right to appeal from doing so.

(b) It shall be the duty of every attorney representing an indigent defendant in any criminal, juvenile court, or civil commitment case to execute and file on his or her client’s behalf a timely notice of appeal when the attorney is of the opinion that arguably meritorious grounds exist for a reversal or modification of the judgment or orders to be appealed from, and where, in the attorney’s judgment, it is in the defendant’s interest to pursue any relief that may be available to him or her on appeal; or when directed to do so by a defendant having a right to appeal.

With the notice of appeal the attorney shall file a brief statement of the points to be raised on appeal and a designation of any document, paper, pleading, or transcript of oral proceedings necessary to properly present those points on appeal when the document, paper, pleading, or transcript of oral proceedings would not be included in the normal record on appeal according to the applicable provisions of the California Rules of Court. The executing of the notice of appeal by the defendant’s attorney shall not constitute an undertaking to represent the defendant on appeal unless the undertaking is expressly stated in the notice of appeal.

If the defendant was represented by appointed counsel on the trial level, or if it appears that the defendant will request the appointment of counsel on appeal by reason of indigency, the trial attorney shall also assist the defendant in preparing and submitting a motion for the appointment of counsel and any supporting declaration or affidavit as to the defendant’s financial condition. These documents shall be filed with the trial court at the time of filing a notice of appeal, and shall be transmitted by the clerk of the trial court to the clerk of the appellate court within three judicial days of their receipt. The appellate court shall act upon that motion without unnecessary delay. An attorney’s failure to file a motion for the appointment of counsel with the notice of appeal shall not foreclose the defendant from filing a motion at any time it becomes known to him or her that the attorney has failed to do so, or at any time he or she shall become indigent if he or she was not previously indigent.

(c) The State Public Defender shall, at the request of any attorney representing a prospective indigent appellant or at the request of the prospective indigent appellant himself or herself, provide counsel and advice to the prospective indigent appellant or attorney as to whether arguably meritorious grounds exist on which the judgment or order to be appealed from would be reversed or modified on appeal.

(d) The failure of a trial attorney to perform any duty prescribed in this section, assign any particular point or error in the notice of appeal, or designate any particular thing for inclusion in the record on appeal shall not foreclose any defendant from filing a notice of appeal on his or her own behalf or from raising any point or argument on appeal; nor shall it foreclose the defendant or his or her counsel on appeal from requesting the augmentation or correction of the record on appeal in the reviewing court.

(e) (1) In order to expedite certification of the entire record on appeal in all capital cases, the defendant’s trial counsel, whether retained by the defendant or court-appointed, and the prosecutor shall continue to represent the respective parties. Each counsel’s obligations extend to taking all steps necessary to facilitate the preparation and timely certification of the record of all trial court proceedings.

(2) The duties imposed on trial counsel in paragraph (1) shall not foreclose the defendant’s appellate counsel from requesting additions or corrections to the record on appeal in either the trial court or the California Supreme Court in a manner provided by rules of court adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 232.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1241.

In any case in which counsel other than a public defender has been appointed by the Supreme Court or by a court of appeal to represent a party to any appeal or proceeding, such counsel shall receive a reasonable sum for compensation and necessary expenses, the amount of which shall be determined by the court and paid from any funds appropriated to the Judicial Council for that purpose. Claim for the payment of such compensation and expenses shall be made on a form prescribed by the Judicial Council and presented by counsel to the clerk of the appointing court. After the court has made its order fixing the amount to be paid the clerk shall transmit a copy of the order to the State Controller who shall draw his warrant in payment thereof and transmit it to the payee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

1242.

An appeal taken by the people in no case stays or affects the operation of a judgment in favor of the defendant, until judgment is reversed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1243.

An appeal to the Supreme Court or to a court of appeal from a judgment of conviction stays the execution of the judgment in all cases where a sentence of death has been imposed, but does not stay the execution of the judgment or order granting probation in any other case unless the trial or appellate court shall so order. The granting or refusal of such an order shall rest in the discretion of the court, except that a court shall not stay any duty to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290. If the order is made, the clerk of the court shall issue a certificate stating that the order has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 960, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1244.

If the certificate provided for in the preceding section is filed, the Sheriff must, if the defendant be in his custody, upon being served with a copy thereof, keep the defendant in his custody without executing the judgment, and detain him to abide the judgment on appeal.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.

If before the granting of the certificate, the execution of the judgment has commenced, the further execution thereof is suspended, and upon service of a copy of such certificate the defendant must be restored, by the officer in whose custody he is, to his original custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 538.)
-------------------------------------------

1246.

The record on appeal shall be made up and filed in such time and manner as shall be prescribed in rules adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1a. Judicial Council Rules [1247k. - 1247k.]

1247k.

The Judicial Council shall have the power to prescribe by rules for the practice and procedure on appeal, and for the time and manner in which the records on such appeals shall be made up and filed, in all criminal cases in all courts of this state.

The rules shall take effect on July 1, 1943, and thereafter all laws in conflict therewith shall be of no further force or effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Dismissing an Appeal for Irregularity [1248. - 1248.]

1248.

If the appeal is irregular in any substantial particular, but not otherwise, the appellate court may order it to be dismissed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Argument of the Appeal [1252. - 1256.]

1252.

On an appeal in a criminal case, no continuance shall be granted upon stipulation of counsel, and no continuance shall be granted for any longer period than the ends of justice shall require. On an appeal by a defendant, the appellate court shall, in addition to the issues raised by the defendant, consider and pass upon all rulings of the trial court adverse to the State which it may be requested to pass upon by the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

The judgment may be affirmed if the appellant fail to appear, but can be reversed only after argument, though the respondent fail to appear.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

Upon the argument of the appeal, if the offense is punishable with death, two counsel must be heard on each side, if they require it. In any other case the Court may, in its discretion, restrict the argument to one counsel on each side.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

The defendant need not personally appear in the appellate Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

It shall be the duty of the district attorney to cooperate with and assist the attorney general in presenting all criminal matters on appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1927, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Judgment Upon Appeal [1258. - 1265.]

1258.

After hearing the appeal, the Court must give judgment without regard to technical errors or defects, or to exceptions, which do not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.

Upon an appeal taken by the defendant, the appellate court may, without exception having been taken in the trial court, review any question of law involved in any ruling, order, instruction, or thing whatsoever said or done at the trial or prior to or after judgment, which thing was said or done after objection made in and considered by the lower court, and which affected the substantial rights of the defendant. The appellate court may also review any instruction given, refused or modified, even though no objection was made thereto in the lower court, if the substantial rights of the defendant were affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1016.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.

The court may reverse, affirm, or modify a judgment or order appealed from, or reduce the degree of the offense or attempted offense or the punishment imposed, and may set aside, affirm, or modify any or all of the proceedings subsequent to, or dependent upon, such judgment or order, and may, if proper, order a new trial and may, if proper, remand the cause to the trial court for such further proceedings as may be just under the circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1166.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

When a new trial is ordered it must be directed to be had in the Court of the county from which the appeal was taken.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.
